Louisiana, session 2026, HB608.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3703(M) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3703. Intercollegiate athlete's compensation and rights; responsibilities of
postsecondary education institutions
* * *
M.(1) Any document disclosed by the an intercollegiate athlete to the
postsecondary education institution where he is enrolled that references the terms
and conditions of the athlete's his contract for compensation shall be confidential and
not subject to inspection, examination, copying, or reproduction pursuant to the
Public Records Law.
(2) The total amount of revenue expended by a postsecondary education
institution during each fiscal year as part of an intercollegiate athletics revenue
sharing program is subject to public disclosure. However, the following records and
information are not subject to public disclosure and not subject to inspection,
examination, copying, or reproduction pursuant to the Public Records Law:
(a) The total amount, and any percentage amount, of those revenue funds
paid as part of a postsecondary education institution's athletics revenue sharing
program to any specific intercollegiate athlete.
(b) The total amount, and any percentage amount, of those revenue funds
allocated as part of a postsecondary education institution's athletics revenue sharing
program to any specific intercollegiate sport or athletic program.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 608 ENROLLED
(3) Any document related to or created as part of the process of negotiating
an agreement with an intercollegiate athlete as part of a postsecondary education
institution's intercollegiate athletics revenue sharing program, including any
agreements entered into with any specific intercollegiate athlete, is confidential and
not subject to inspection, examination, copying, or reproduction pursuant to the
Public Records Law.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply both prospectively and retroactively
to all records, documents, information, and requests for disclosure existing, created, or
pending on or afer the effective date of this Act. This Act is intended to clarify and confirm
the confidentiality of the records and information described in R.S. 17:3703(M), as amended
and reenacted by this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.